South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4588.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-63-33(C) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (3) In the event that a student does not subsequently, physically reside in the school district in which he intended to reside and enroll, pursuant to the provisions of this section, the student's parent or guardian must enroll the student in the school district in which he physically resides. The parent or guardian must provide proof of physical residency to the school district within sixty days of the conclusion of the current school year or one year from the parent or guardian's reporting-for-duty date or separation date, whichever option provides greater stability for the student, before being considered a resident of another district. A high school student who is a junior or senior must be permitted to remain enrolled in his current school placement until graduation despite any changes in physical residency. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----